src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!todo: 
    !VII
    !   indep: negation
    !VTA 
    !   write up description of how theme-sign, number, peripheral slots are interacting
    !plural subject only
    !obligatory inverse
    !participles (VTI, VII)
    !confirm ccnj for cnj dub
    !iteratives
    !dependent nouns (not much to it, just require prefixes for some stems) -> think this is done


!#####
!{Bibliography info
!#####

!Not yet entered

!#####
!{Commence work
!#####

!does all verbal inflection need to be in this file, or can I split it up a bit?
    !yes, you add the new files to morphology/Makefile.am (around line 24)

!Continuation lexicon after PREFIXES is in ../stems/
!This almost certainly is going to be revised
!../stems/verbs.lexc will have internal divisions
!furthermore, why shouldn't person prefixes be common between nouns and verbs?

!#####
!{Prefixes
!#####
!moved to personprefixes.lexc
!LEXICON V_PREFIXES
!1+:ni%<   V_FIRST_PERSON_SET ;
!2+:gi%<   V_SECOND_PERSON_SET ;
!3+:o%<   V_THIRD_PERSON_SET ;
!        V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR ; 
!!Add alignment recs to style
!
!!style question: PERSON spelled out here and in flags
!!but some sublexicon titles have PERS
!
!!_FLAG -> _SET
!LEXICON V_FIRST_PERSON_SET !add _SET to style
!@P.Person.1@  V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR ;
!@P.Person.1@  V_PERSON_EXTENDED ;
!
!LEXICON V_SECOND_PERSON_SET 
!@P.Person.2@  V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR ;
!@P.Person.2@  V_PERSON_EXTENDED ;
!
!LEXICON V_THIRD_PERSON_SET 
!@P.Person.3@  V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR ;
!@P.Person.3@  V_PERSON_EXTENDED ;
!
!LEXICON V_PERSON_EXTENDED
!!need boundary to stop vowel coalescence across prefix-stem boundary
!0:da%*    V_PERSON_EXTENDED_HYPHEN ; 
!0:di%*    V_PERSON_EXTENDED_HYPHEN ; 
!0:doo%*    V_PERSON_EXTENDED_HYPHEN ; 
!
!LEXICON V_PERSON_EXTENDED_HYPHEN
!0:-     VERBS ;
!        VERBS ;
!
LEXICON V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR
!{ unsure of position
!{ DAB Added
PV/jibwaa+:Bv1jibwaa-    V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET    " 1 before" ; !Not sure what the analysis is supposed to be, but this preverb gets writen without a hyphen
PV/ji+:ji-    V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET    "subordinator" ; !ji- can precede gii- (Waaskone miinwaa Gnebgood story), I don't want to try to compute meaning of jibwaa (above) from ji and bwaa (below)
!}
PV/ji-bwaa+:ji-bwaa-    V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET    " 1 before" ; !Rand key:n20114310-3-12n
PV/CCNJ+:PV/CCNJ+   V_PREVERBS_CCNJ_SET ; !changed conjunct trigger (should it precede this slot?)
!}
PV/e+:e-    V_PREVERBS_CCNJ_SET " 1  <i>historically, the changed form of the preverb <nish>a-</nish>, but its function has broadened in modern usage.</i>"; !This is in competition with initial change. Rhodes 1996:4 indicates that initial change still dominates for participles
PV/a+:a-   V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET " 1 where;  2 when;  3 which, that which"; !does this just syncopate to nothing? !need update on this preverb -> it does not delete
!NO LONGER MUST BE LISTED PV/gaa+:gaa-  V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET " 1 the changed form of the past tense preverb <nish>gii-</nish>";
PV/gaa+:gaa-  V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET "that" ;!formerly changed form of gii, has life of own now 
        V_PREVERBS_TENSE ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_CCNJ_SET
@P.Ccnj.Yes@    V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_SUBORDINATOR_ORDER_SET
@P.Order.Cnj@   V_PREVERBS_TENSE ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_TENSE
!check Valentine ch 16 for more
!{attention!
PV/daa-gii+:daa-gii-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY    " 1 would, would have; could; should; can" ; !Rand key:n201012716-46-13n
PV/da-gii+:da-gii-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY    " 1 would, would have; could; should; can" ; !DAB added because it exists in AM sentences
PV/da-wii+:da-wii-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY    " 1 would (future), could (future)" ; !DAB added because it exists in AM sentences
!}
PV/wii+:wii-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 going to [do something], want to [do something], intend [to do something], in order to [do something];  2 future tense, in the future;  3 be in need of (non-living things);  4 please;  5 seeking to [do something];  6 in order to [do something]"; 
PV/gii+:gii-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 [past tense]";
PV/gii+:gii-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 would, could"; !no changed form
            V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_GET ;
            V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_GET
@D.Order@           V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_INDEP ;!use [RD].Order/Ccnj... elsewhere, since there is only one value of order, these are equivalent
@P.Order.Cnj@@D.Ccnj@   V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_CNJ ; 
@P.Order.Cnj@@R.Ccnj@   V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_CCNJ ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_INDEP
PV/da+:da-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 shall, will; should, could"; 
PV/ga+:ga-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 will, shall;  2 let's, let";
PV/daa+:daa-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 can, could, ought, should, would"; 

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_CNJ
PV/da+:ji-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 shall, will; should, could"; 
PV/ga+:ji-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 will, shall;  2 let's, let";
PV/daa+:da-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 can, could, ought, should, would"; 
PV/daa+:ji-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 can, could, ought, should, would"; 

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_TENSE_IRREG_MODE_CCNJ !all of these undergo ccnj -> ge
PV/da+:ga-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 shall, will; should, could";        !used to go to V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION 
PV/ga+:ga-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 will, shall;  2 let's, let";        !used to go to V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION 
PV/daa+:ga-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY " 1 can, could, ought, should, would"; !used to go to  V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION

!LEXICON V_REDUPLICATION
!Redup+:CRED1VRED1   V_REDUPLICATION_SET ; !bebooni-zegim puts redup before (lexical?) preverbs
!                    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY ; 
!
!LEXICON V_REDUPLICATION_SET
!@P.Redup.Red@   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_GATEWAY !slightly different structure because there is a preverb in this slot with an irregular CCNJ form and we have stacking: gii-bmi-ni-bgidnamwaanenh 'I went around and put it' from MAC
    V_PREVERBS_RELATIVE ;
    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_IRREGULAR_GET ;
    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION ; 

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION
!{ uncertain of position
PV/zaagji+:zaagiji-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING    " 1 out of [a place], outside" ; !Rand key:n72972574762n
PV/biindge+:biindige-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING    " 1 used to indicate action that involves entering a building or room" ; !Rand key:n2010113022-28-53n
PV/bskaabii+:biskaabii-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING    " 1 go back, return" ; !Rand key:n201132712-36-52n
PV/aazhda+:aazhVv1da-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING    " 1 from one to another" ; !Rand key:n72974064109n
PV/mbi+:ombi-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING    " 1 go up [in doing something]" ; !Rand key:n71429448810n
!}
PV/biiji+:biiji-  V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 towards this direction, [towards] this way"; !come in direction
PV/ni+:ani-      V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 [do something] as one goes away, go away and [do something], go away, on one's way out, [doing something];  2 as time goes on, as time passes, in the course of time;  3 in the future";
PV/ni+:X2ni-      V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 [do something] as one goes away, go away and [do something], go away, on one's way out, [doing something];  2 as time goes on, as time passes, in the course of time;  3 in the future";
PV/bmi+:bimi-    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 come by [and do something], go by [and do something], go by [doing something];  2 in the course of time, as time goes on, in time, through time;  3 going along [doing something], going about [doing something], going about [in the course of one's activities];  4 get around to [doing something]"; !aimless
PV/bbaa+:bibaa-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 (moving) around, (going) about in activities, out and about;  2 specifying movement about and around in a specifically imprecise and uncertain sense"; !circumference, exhaustive?
PV/bbaa+:babaa-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 (moving) around, (going) about in activities, out and about;  2 specifying movement about and around in a specifically imprecise and uncertain sense"; !circumference, exhaustive?
PV/baa+:baa-   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 around, about, out and about"; !circumference, exhaustive?
PV/wa+:awa-     V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 go and [do sth.]";
PV/oo+:oo-     V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 go [do something], go and [do something]";
PV/wi+:awi-     V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 go and [do something], go [do something]";


LEXICON V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_IRREGULAR_GET
@D.Ccnj@   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_IRREGULAR_INDEP ;
@R.Ccnj@   V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_IRREGULAR_CCNJ ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_IRREGULAR_INDEP
PV/bi+:bi-  V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 come [and do something], come [to do something];  2 in the past"; !come (and _)

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_IRREGULAR_CCNJ
!PV/bi+:abi-  V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 come [and do something], come [to do something];  2 in the past"; !come (and _)
PV/bi+:X2bi-  V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING " 1 come [and do something], come [to do something];  2 in the past"; !come (and _)

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_STACKING
    V_PREVERBS_RELATIVE ;
    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION ;
    V_PREVERBS_DIRECTION_IRREGULAR_INDEP ; 

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_RELATIVE
!{unsure of position
PV/bwaa+:bwaa-  V_PREVERBS_RELATIVE_ORDER_SET " 1 lest, not, so that not"; !Valentine 2001 unclear on ordering, while requires conjunct like subordinators, may be preceded by e-, may also be preceded by wii-... semantics definitely not compatible with direction
!}
PV/ko+:ako-  V_PREVERBS_KO_GATEWAY " 1 since, from such point in time;  2 as far as [a certain point];  3 [for] a long time, as long as";
PV/piichi+:apiichi-  V_PREVERBS_ASPECT " 1 to a certain degree, to a certain extent, to such a degree, to such an extent, how, to what extent, so;  2 in the process of..., while";
PV/zhi+:izhi-  V_PREVERBS_ASPECT " 1 as [another], like a certain thing;  2 to a certain place, towards a certain place, in a certain direction;  3 how [to do something], in a certain manner, way [of doing something], thus (in such way), and so;  4 go ahead without preparation, go ahead despite not being ready";
PV/nji+:onji-  V_PREVERBS_ASPECT " 1 at a certain place, from a certain place, from a certain point, where;  2 why;  3 have (in the sense of the English perfect tense)";
!wnji-:onji    V_PREVERBS_ASPECT    " 1 [see nji-]" ; !Rand key:n73072141838n
PV/dzhi+:n5dazhi-   V_PREVERBS_ASPECT " 1 at a certain place, where";
!DUP REMOVE!PV/aana+:aana-   V_PREVERBS_ASPECT " 1 in vain, to no avail" ; !Rand key:n72973263339n
PV/aano+:aano-   V_PREVERBS_ASPECT   " 1 [see aana-]"; !Valentine 2001 doesn't specify slot -> it precedes ntaa- (in aspect class), so moved up from V_PREVERBS_MANNER DAB 2024-01-31
!DUP REMOVE!PV/aana+:X2aana-   V_PREVERBS_ASPECT " 1 in vain, to no avail" ; !optional blocker to stop ccnj yaano!Rand key:n72973263339n
PV/aano+:X2aano-   V_PREVERBS_ASPECT   " 1 [see aana-]"; !optional blocker to stop ccnj yaano!Valentine 2001 doesn't specify slot -> it precedes ntaa- (in aspect class), so moved up from V_PREVERBS_MANNER DAB 2024-01-31
PV/aanwii+:aanawii-    V_PREVERBS_ASPECT    " 1 even though, despite;  2 try to..." ; !Rand key:n201012516-47-22n !moved up from V_PREVERBS_ASPECT due to similarity to aano DAB 2024-01-31
            V_PREVERBS_ASPECT ;
